Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.15.030

Access performance measures. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

By July 1st of each year, the commission shall calculate the following performance measures, provide a copy of the performance measures to the governor and appropriate legislative committees, and make the performance measures available to the public:

(1) The average number of days that elapse between the commission's receipt of reports filed under RCW 29B.25.020, 29B.25.070, 29B.25.090, 29B.25.120, 29B.25.140, 29B.50.010, 29B.50.050, 29B.50.070, and 29B.50.080 and the time that the report, a copy of the report, or a copy of the data or information included in the report, is first accessible to the general public (a) in the commission's office, and (b) via the commission's website;

(2) The percentage of filers pursuant to RCW 29B.15.010 who have used: (a) Hard copy paper format; or (b) electronic format.

[ 2024 c 164 s 406; 2019 c 428 s 5; 2010 c 204 s 204; 1999 c 401 s 3. Formerly RCW 42.17A.065, 42.17.463.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Finding—Effective date—2019 c 428: See notes following RCW 29B.20.110.

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 101-504, 506-601, 603-702, and 801-1103: See note following RCW 29B.15.010.